Arkansas, session 2025, HB2004.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 12, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 11 — Train Defect Detector Safety

23-12-1101. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that in light of the February 2023
railroad train derailment in East Palestine, Ohio, and in light of the
absence of any federal regulation of train defect detectors, the continuing
*ZRC133*
04/09/2025 9:44:10 PM ZRC133

HB2004
operation of railroad corporations with no oversight or regulation of hot box
detectors operating within the state on a main railroad line or branch
railroad line exposes the public to unnecessary dangers and disruptions of
commerce.
(b) The General assembly intends for this act to eliminate unnecessary
dangers and disruptions of commerce imposed on communities and residents of
Arkansas.

23-12-1102. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) "Defect detector" means an integrated or standalone
electronic device that scans passing railroad trains or equipment for a
defect, including without limitation:
(i) A hot wheel bearing;
(ii) A hot wheel;
(iii) A shipment that has an excessive height or
width;
(iv) Shifted lading; and
(v) Dragging equipment.
(B) "Defect detector" includes without limitation:
(i) An acoustic bearing detector;
(ii) A dragging equipment detector; and
(iii) A wheel impact detector;
(2)(A) “Railroad” means non-highway ground transportation that
runs on rails or electromagnetic guideways in this state.
(B) "Railroad" includes without limitation a:
(i) Commuter railroad service or other short-haul
railroad passenger service in a metropolitan or suburban area; and
(ii) High-speed ground transportation system that
connects metropolitan areas without regard to whether the high-speed ground
transportation system uses new technologies not associated with traditional
railroads.
(C) "Railroad" does not include a rapid transit operation
in an urban area that is not connected to the general railroad system of
transportation;
(3) "Railroad corporation" means a corporation, company, or
04/09/2025 9:44:10 PM ZRC133

HB2004
individual that owns or operates a railroad in this state as an owner,
lessee, mortgagee, trustee, assignee, or receiver;
(4)(A) “Railroad train" means a locomotive, multiple locomotives
coupled together, or one (1) or more locomotives coupled with one (1) or more
cars that require an air brake test under 49 C.F.R. Part 232, as it existed
on January 1, 2025, or 49 C.F.R. Part 238, as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(B) "Railroad train" does not include:
(i) A locomotive or car during switching operations;
or
(ii) A locomotive or car is that operated to
classify and assemble cars within a railroad yard for the purpose of making
or breaking up railroad trains;
(5) "Restricted speed" means a speed that:
(A) Permits a railroad train to stop within one-half (1/2)
of the range of vision; and
(B) Does not exceed twenty miles per hour (20 m.p.h.); and
(6)(A) "Trending defect detector technology" means an algorithm-
based technology applied to a defect detector that allows for communication
from one (1) defect detector to another defect detector in order to predict
or detect a defect of a railroad train.
(B) "Trending defect detector technology" includes without
limitation the communication between defect detectors of information
concerning:
(i) The changing temperature of wheel bearings on a
railroad;
(ii) Acoustic information; and
(iii) Other data that would lead to the discovery of
a failure of rolling equipment.

23-12-1103. Defect detector — Minimum requirements.
(a) A defect detector shall be equipped with:
(1) A hot box detector;
(2) A hot wheel detector; and
(3) Dragging equipment detector technology.
(b)(1) A defect detector shall be equipped with an audible alarm that
broadcasts on a radio channel frequency assigned to the specific territory in
04/09/2025 9:44:10 PM ZRC133

HB2004
which the defect detector is located by the Association of American
Railroads.
(2) If a defect is detected, a defect detector shall be equipped
to:
(A) Sound an alarm over the assigned radio channel
frequency three (3) consecutive times for no longer than five (5) seconds and
with five (5) seconds of silence in between each sounding of the alarm; and
(B) Repeat an audible message three (3) times with twenty
(20) seconds of silence between each broadcast of the audible message stating
the following information:
(i) The defect detector location milepost and name;
(ii) The track number if the defect detector is
located in multiple track territory;
(iii) The total number of axles in the railroad
train, including motive power; and
(iv) The location of defects within the railroad
train or equipment.
(3) If a defect is not detected, the defect detector shall be
equipped to provide an audible message that states the following:
(A) The location of the defect detector milepost and name;
(B) The track number in multiple track territory;
(C) The total number of axles in the railroad train,
including motive power;
(D) The speed of the railroad train; and
(E) A statement that no defect was detected, including the
phrase, "repeat no defects, out".

23-12-1104. Trending defect detector technology.
(a) A defect detector equipped with trending defect detector
technology or similar technology shall:
(1) Not have a silent alarm; and
(2) Be listed to all operating crew who operate equipment on the
railroad track on which the defect detector is located.
(b) If a railroad train passes a defect detector equipped with
trending defect detector technology and a trending defect issue is detected:
(1) The operating crew of the railroad train shall stop in
04/09/2025 9:44:10 PM ZRC133

HB2004
accordance with safe railroad train handling procedures issued by the
railroad corporation that owns or operates the railroad train;
(2) An inspection of the railroad train shall be made by the
operating crew from a position on the ground;
(3) The railroad train inspection results shall be noted by the
operating crew and presented to the appropriate officer of the railroad
corporation, the dispatcher, or another qualified person; and
(4) If the inspection under subdivision (b)(2) of this section
finds that the railroad train is safe to move, the railroad train may proceed
at a speed that does not exceed:
(A) Ten miles per hour (10 m.p.h.) if the railroad train
is carrying hazardous materials; or
(B) Thirty miles per hour (30 m.p.h.) if the railroad
train is not carrying hazardous materials.
(c) If a railroad train that has a trending defect issue detected
under subsection (b) of this section passes another defect detector equipped
with trending defect detector technology and a trending defect issue is
detected a second time:
(1) The operating crew of the railroad train shall stop in
accordance with safe railroad train handling procedures issued by the
railroad corporation that owns or operates the railroad train;
(2) The railroad train or equipment shall be inspected by the
operating crew from a position on the ground;
(3) A determination shall be made by a qualified person whether
the railroad train is safe to move based on the inspection required under
subdivision (c)(2) of this section;
(4) After the inspection required under subdivision (c)(2) of
this section, the railroad train or equipment shall be set out immediately by
the operating crew at the nearest siding, spur, or designated repair track;
and
(5) The railroad train or equipment shall not be moved unless a
qualified person has thoroughly inspected and repaired the railroad train or
equipment.

23-12-1105. Defect detector — Requirements.
(a) An installed defect detector shall remain on with all audible
04/09/2025 9:44:10 PM ZRC133

HB2004
alarms set to a volume high enough for an operating crew to hear reporting
from the defect detector.
(b) A defect detector that is equipped with a hot wheel bearing
detector shall have a sensitivity level no higher than one hundred ten
degrees Fahrenheit (110°F).
(c)(1) If the repair of a defect detector is required, the railroad
corporation that owns the defect detector shall notify the Arkansas
Department of Transportation.
(2) A railroad train operating on a railroad around a defect
detector that requires repair:
(A) Shall not exceed the restricted speed; and
(B) May resume timetable speed if the next defect detector
on the railroad indicates that the railroad train has no defects.

23-12-1106. Information required to be published.
A railroad corporation shall publish and make known to all operating
crews that operate railroad trains over railroad tracks equipped with defect
detectors that:
(1) An operating crew of a railroad train that receives an alarm
from a defect detector or a defect detector equipped with trending defect
detector technology shall reduce the speed of the railroad train in
accordance with the railroad corporation's operating rules until the defect
detector is cleared;
(2) After receiving a defect detector message indicating a
defect, the operating crew of the railroad train shall stop in accordance
with the railroad corporation's operating rules and inspect the railroad
train from a position on the ground;
(3) An operating crew of a railroad train receiving a defect
message of dragging equipment or a similar message from a defect detector
shall stop immediately in accordance with the railroad corporation's
operating rules and inspect the railroad train from a position on the ground;
(4) If defects are found, the railroad train shall be inspected
by the operating crew based on the industry standard of twenty (20) axles
before and after the reported defect on both sides of the railroad train;
(5) An inspection of a railroad train that is required based on
a report from a defect detector shall not be made from a vehicle or any other
04/09/2025 9:44:10 PM ZRC133

HB2004
form of transportation; and
(6) A person shall not relieve a railroad train operating crew
or an operator of a railroad train or equipment from an inspection under this
section while operating the railroad train or equipment within the state.

23-12-1107. Discrepancy in number of axles detected by defect
detector.
(a) If a defect detector detects that a railroad train has at least
two (2) fewer axles than the number of axles known to be in the railroad
train, the discrepancy shall be reported to the proper railroad authority
governing railroad train movement in the territory.
(b) If an axle count provided by a defect detector is at least two (2)
or more axles than the number of axles known to be in the railroad train:
(1) The proper railroad authority governing railroad train
movement in the territory shall be notified;
(2) The extra equipment or extra railroad train car shall be
identified within five (5) miles of the location where the defect detector
reported the defect;
(3) If communication is not established with the proper railroad
authority, all movement of the railroad train shall stop within five (5)
miles of the location where the defect detector reported the defect;
(4) The railroad train shall not proceed unless the extra
equipment or extra railroad train has been identified;
(5) If the extra equipment is known to be hazardous, the
railroad train shall not proceed without a radio waybill or proper
documentation; and
(6) Operating crew at the operating controls of a moving
railroad train or equipment shall not be permitted to copy or repeat radio
waybill information.

23-12-1108. Civil penalty.
(a)(1) A person or railroad corporation who violates this subchapter
is subject to a civil penalty of at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000) but
not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each day that the
violation continues.
(2) A person or railroad corporation that violates this
04/09/2025 9:44:10 PM ZRC133

HB2004
subchapter is subject to a one-time civil penalty of five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000) if the Director of the State Highways and Transportation
finds:
(A) The violation to be grossly negligent; or
(B) That a pattern of repeated violations has caused:
(i) An imminent hazard of death or injury to an
individual; or
(ii) Death or injury to an individual.
(b) A civil penalty collected under this section shall be deposited
into the State Highway and Transportation Department Fund to be used for the
maintenance, repair, and construction of the state highway system.
(c) If a violation of this subchapter results in a railroad train
derailment in the vicinity of a municipality and a civil penalty is assessed
under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, one-half (1/2) of the civil penalty
shall be remitted to the Arkansas Department of Transportation and one-half
(1/2) of the civil penalty shall be remitted to the affected municipality.
(d) The director shall determine the amount of a civil penalty imposed
under subsection (a) of this section based on:
(1) The nature, circumstances, extent, and gravity of the
violation;
(2) With respect to the violator, the:
(A) Degree of the violator's culpability;
(B) Violator's history of violations;
(C) Violator's ability to pay; and
(D) Effect on the violator's ability to continue to do
business; and
(3) Any other factors required by law.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Compliance.
A railroad corporation operating within this state has twelve (12)
months from the effective date of this act to retune all defect detectors
within the state to ensure compliance with this act.




04/09/2025 9:44:10 PM ZRC133